District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.04

Removal.

(a)

The Mayor may remove a member of a board or advisory committee for incompetence, misconduct, or neglect of duty, after due notice and a hearing.

(b)

The failure of a member of a board or advisory committee to attend at least 1/2 of the regular, scheduled meetings of the board or advisory committee within a 12-month period shall constitute neglect of duty within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 404, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3304.4.